New York, session 2025-2026, S62.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.07 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding three new subdivisions 3, 4 and 5 to 3 read as follows: 4 3. The commissioner shall provide for the health, safety and welfare 5 of the public using facilities under its jurisdiction, which shall 6 include ensuring a minimum staff of three hundred eighty-five permanent- 7 ly appointed, full time regional state park police officers at state 8 parks, beaches, campgrounds, historic sites and concert venues. The 9 number of regional state park police officers deployed to each region 10 shall be equivalent to the percentage of each region's five year attend- 11 ance average. 12 4. The commissioner shall not open a new state park, beach, camp- 13 ground, historic site or concert venue unless such commissioner submits 14 a staffing plan to the legislature that demonstrates there is a suffi- 15 cient number of regional state park police to provide adequate and 16 appropriate delivery of police services to patrons visiting the new 17 site. 18 5. The commissioner may redeploy regional state park police officers 19 outside of their assigned region in the case of an emergency. Emergen- 20 cies are defined as natural disasters, declared emergencies and mass 21 casualty incidents. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 23 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00383-01-5